District of Columbia statutes.
47-2316

Procedure for determination, redetermination, assessment, or reassessment; interest penalty; liability for payment.

If a report required by this subchapter is not filed, or if the report when filed is incorrect or insufficient, or if the tax as imposed by this subchapter has been determined to be due from a licensee or another person, the amount of tax due shall be determined by the Mayor from information as may be obtainable. Notice of the determination shall be given to the licensee or other person required to file a report or pay the tax. Assessments of any deficiencies in the tax due under this chapter, or any interest and penalties thereon, shall be governed by § 47-4312.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 19
as added Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 11(i), 28 DCR 246
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 401, 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305,§ 406(oo), 48 DCR 334
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-217, § 4(d), 51 DCR 9126
This section is referenced in § 47-2319.
1981 Ed., § 47-2316.
D.C. Law 13-305 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 15-217 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-513, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8976).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-553, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10359).
Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”